Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 11. Benefits.
§ 71-5-516.
Disclosure of child support obligations on claim for benefits; deduction and withholding from benefit.

An individual filing a new claim for benefits shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether or not the individual owes child support obligations as defined under subsection (7). If any such individual discloses that he owes child support obligations, and is determined to be eligible for benefits, the commission shall notify the child support enforcement agency that the individual has been determined to be eligible for benefits.

The commission shall deduct and withhold from any benefits payable to an individual that owes child support obligations as defined under subsection (7):

The amount specified by the individual to the commission to be deducted and withheld under this subsection, if neither (b) nor (c) is applicable; or

The amount (if any) determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the commission under Section 454(19)(A)and(B)(i) of the Social Security Act by the child support enforcement agency, unless (c) is applicable; or

Any amount otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from such benefits pursuant to legal process (as that term is defined in Section 462(e) of the Social Security Act) properly served upon the commission. Transmittal of the information in subsection (b) or (c) by automated means shall constitute proper service of legal process upon the commission.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (2) shall be paid by the commission to the child support enforcement agency.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (2) shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as benefits and paid by such individual to the child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of the individual’s child support obligations.

For purposes of subsections (1) through (4), the term “benefits” means any compensation payable under this chapter (including amounts payable by the commission pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance or allowances with respect to unemployment).

This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the child support enforcement agency for the administrative costs incurred by the commission under this section which are attributable to child support obligations being enforced by the child support enforcement agency. No administrative costs of either the commission or the child support enforcement agency shall be deducted or withheld by the commission from any benefits payable, however. The amount to be deducted and withheld shall be in an even dollar amount, and the agency shall distribute the support collection in the manner prescribed by Title IV-D of the Social Security Act.

The term “child support obligations” is defined for purposes of this section as including only obligations which are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in Section 454 of the Social Security Act which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 480, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 332; Laws, 1991, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 71-5-517.
Initial determination [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Upon the taking of a claim by the department, an initial determination thereon shall be made promptly and shall include a determination with respect to whether or not benefits are payable, the week with respect to which benefits shall commence, the weekly benefit amount payable and the maximum duration of benefits. In any case in which the payment or denial of benefits will be determined by the provisions of subsection A(4) of Section 71-5-513, the examiner shall promptly transmit all the evidence with respect to that subsection to the department, which, on the basis of evidence so submitted and such additional evidence as it may require, shall make an initial determination with respect thereto. An initial determination may for good cause be reconsidered. The claimant, his most recent employing unit and all employers whose experience-rating record would be charged with benefits pursuant to such determination shall be promptly notified of such initial determination or any amended initial determination and the reason therefor. Benefits shall be denied or, if the claimant is otherwise eligible, promptly paid in accordance with the initial determination or amended initial determination. The jurisdiction of the department over benefit claims which have not been appealed shall be continuous. The claimant or any party to the initial determination or amended initial determination may file an appeal from such initial determination or amended initial determination within fourteen (14) days after notification thereof, or after the date such notification was sent to his last known address.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, benefits shall be paid promptly in accordance with a determination or redetermination, or the decision of an appeal tribunal, the Board of Review or a reviewing court upon the issuance of such determination, redetermination or decision in favor of the claimant (regardless of the pendency of the period to apply for reconsideration, file an appeal, or petition for judicial review, as the case may be, or the pendency of any such application, filing or petition), unless and until such determination, redetermination or decision has been modified or reversed by a subsequent redetermination or decision, in which event benefits shall be paid or denied in accordance with such modifying or reversing redetermination or decision. Any benefits finally determined to have been erroneously paid may be set up as an overpayment to the claimant and must be liquidated before any future benefits can be paid to the claimant. If, subsequent to such initial determination or amended initial determination, benefits with respect to any week for which a claim has been filed are denied for reasons other than matters included in the initial determination or amended initial determination, the claimant shall be promptly notified of the denial and the reason therefor and may appeal therefrom in accordance with the procedure herein described for appeals from initial determination or amended initial determination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7381; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4b; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1b; Laws, 1972, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 352; Laws, 1986, ch. 316, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 40; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451 ,§ 40, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-519.
Appeals [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Unless such appeal is withdrawn, an appeal tribunal appointed by the executive director, after affording the parties reasonable opportunity for fair hearing, shall affirm, modify or reverse the findings of fact and initial determination or amended initial determination. The parties shall be duly notified of such tribunal’s decision, together with its reasons therefor, which shall be deemed to be the final decision of the executive director unless, within fourteen (14) days after the date of notification of such decision, further appeal is initiated pursuant to Section 71-5-523.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7382; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4c; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1c; Laws, 1977, ch. 448; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 41; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 41, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-521.
Appeal tribunals.

To hear and decide appealed claims, the board of review shall appoint one or more impartial appeal tribunals consisting in each case of either a referee, who shall be selected in accordance with Section 71-5-121, or a body consisting of three (3) members, one (1) of whom shall be a referee, who shall serve as chairman, one (1) of whom shall be a representative of employers, and the other of whom shall serve as a representative of employees. Each of the latter two (2) members shall serve at the pleasure of the board of review and be paid a fee of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per day for active service on such tribunals, plus necessary expenses. Referees shall be paid such salary or per diem as may be determined by the commission, and such expenses as may be allowed by the commission. No person shall participate on behalf of the commission or the board of review in any case in which he is an interested party. The board of review may designate alternates to serve in the absence or disqualification of any member of an appeal tribunal. The chairman shall act alone in the absence or disqualification of any other member and his alternates. In no case shall the hearings proceed unless the chairman of the appeal tribunal is present.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7383; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4d; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1d.

§ 71-5-523.
Board of review [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The Board of Review may on its own motion affirm, modify, or set aside any decision of an appeal tribunal on the basis of the evidence previously submitted in such case, or direct the taking of additional evidence, or may permit any of the parties to such decision to initiate further appeals before it. The Board of Review shall permit such further appeal by any of the parties to a decision of an appeal tribunal which is not unanimous, and by the examiner whose decision has been overruled or modified by an appeal tribunal. The Board of Review may remove to itself or transfer to another appeal tribunal the proceedings on any claim pending before an appeal tribunal. Any proceedings so removed to the Board of Review shall be heard by a quorum thereof in accordance with the requirements of Section 71-5-519 and within fifteen (15) days after notice of appeal has been received by the executive director. No notice of appeal shall be deemed to be received by the executive director, within the meaning of this section, until all prior appeals pending before the Board of Review have been heard. The Board of Review shall, within four (4) days after its decision, so notify the parties to any proceeding of its findings and decision.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7384; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4e; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1e; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 42, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-525.
Procedure [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The manner in which appealed claims shall be presented and the conduct of hearings and appeals shall be in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Board of Review for determining the rights of the parties, whether or not such regulations conform to common law or statutory rules of evidence and other technical rules of procedure. A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings in connection with an appealed claim. The department’s entire file relative to the appealed claim shall be a part of such record and shall be considered as evidence. All testimony at any hearing upon an appealed claim shall be recorded, but need not be transcribed unless the claim is further appealed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7385; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4f; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1f; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 44; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 43, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-527.
Witness fees.

Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to Sections 71-5-515 through 71-5-533 shall be allowed fees at a rate fixed by the commission. Such fees shall be deemed a part of the expense of administering this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7386; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4g; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1g.

§ 71-5-529.
Appeal to courts [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Any decision of the Board of Review, in the absence of an appeal therefrom as herein provided, shall become final ten (10) days after the date of notification; and judicial review thereof shall be permitted only after any party claiming to be aggrieved thereby has exhausted his administrative remedies as provided by this chapter. The department shall be deemed to be a party to any judicial action involving any such decision, and may be represented in any such judicial action by any qualified attorney employed by the department and designated by it for that purpose or, at the department’s request, by the Attorney General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7387; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4h; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1h; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 44; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 44; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 44; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 45,; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 44, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-531.
Court review [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Within ten (10) days after the decision of the Board of Review has become final, any party aggrieved thereby may secure judicial review thereof by commencing an action, in the circuit court of the county in which the plaintiff resides, against the department for the review of such decision, in which action any other party to the proceeding before the Board of Review shall be made a defendant. In cases wherein the plaintiff is not a resident of the State of Mississippi, such action may be filed in the circuit court of the county in which the employer resides, the county in which the cause of action arose, or in the county of employment. In such action, a petition which need not be verified, but which shall state the grounds upon which a review is sought, shall be served upon the department or upon such person as the department may designate, and such service shall be deemed completed service on all parties; but there shall be left with the party so served as many copies of the petition as there are defendants, and the department shall forthwith mail one (1) such copy to each such defendant. With its answer, the department shall certify and file with said court all documents and papers and a transcript of all testimony taken in the matter, together with the Board of Review’s findings of fact and decision therein. The department may also, in its discretion, certify to such court questions of law involved in any decision. In any judicial proceedings under this section, the findings of the Board of Review as to the facts, if supported by evidence and in the absence of fraud, shall be conclusive, and the jurisdiction of the court shall be confined to questions of law. Such actions, and the questions so certified, shall be heard in a summary manner and shall be given precedence over all other civil cases. An appeal may be taken from the decision of the circuit court of the county in which the plaintiff resides to the Supreme Court of Mississippi, in the same manner, but not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, as is provided in civil cases. It shall not be necessary, in any judicial proceeding under this section, to enter exceptions to the rulings of the Board of Review, and no bond shall be required for entering such appeal. Upon the final determination of such judicial proceeding, the Board of Review shall enter an order in accordance with such determination. A petition for judicial review shall not act as a supersedeas or stay unless the Board of Review shall so order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7388; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4i; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § li; Laws, 1996, ch. 464, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 45, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-533.
Appeal by commission.

The commission shall be authorized to appeal from decisions of the board of review involving questions of interpretation of this chapter. Such appeals shall be served upon the other parties to the decision of the board of review and shall be heard by the courts in the manner as provided in Section 71-5-531. Such an appeal by the commission under this section shall not have the effect of denying benefits to any claimant who has been awarded benefits by virtue of the decision of the board of review from which the appeal is taken.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7389; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4j; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1j.

§ 71-5-535.
Waiver of rights void.

Any agreement by an individual to waive, release, or commute his right to benefits or any other rights under this chapter shall be void. Any agreement by any individual in the employ of any person or concern to pay all or any portion of an employer’s contributions, required under this chapter from such employer, shall be void. No employer shall directly or indirectly make or require or accept any deduction from wages to finance the employer’s contributions required from him, or require or accept any waiver of any right hereunder by any individual in his employ. Any employer or officer or agent of an employer who violates any provision of this section shall, for each offense, be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7434; Laws, 1936, ch. 176; Laws, 1938, ch. 147.

§ 71-5-537.
Limitation of fees.

No individual claiming benefits shall be charged fees of any kind in any proceeding under this chapter by the board of review, the commission, their representatives, or by any court or any officer thereof. Any individual claiming benefits in any proceedings before the commission, the board of review, their representatives, or a court may be represented by counsel or other duly authorized agent; but no such counsel or agents shall either charge or receive for such services more than an amount approved by the board of review. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall, for each such offense, be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7435; Laws, 1936, ch. 176; Laws, 1938, ch. 147.

§ 71-5-539.
No assignment of benefits; exemptions.

Any assignment, pledge or incumbrance of any right to benefits which are or may become due or payable under this chapter shall be void. Such rights to benefits shall be exempt from levy, execution, attachment or any other remedy whatsoever provided for the collection of debt; and benefits received by any individual, so long as they are not mingled with other funds of the recipient, shall be exempt from any remedy whatsoever for the collection of all debts except debts incurred for necessities furnished to such individual or his spouse or dependents during the time when such individual was unemployed. Any waiver of any exemption provided in this section shall be void. This section does not apply to the deduction from benefits provided by Section 71-5-516.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7436; Laws, 1936, ch. 176; Laws, 1938, ch. 147; Laws, 1982, ch. 480, § 5, eff from and after October 1, 1982.

§ 71-5-541.
Construction [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

A. (1) In the administration of this chapter, the department shall cooperate with the Department of Labor to the fullest extent consistent with the provisions of this chapter and shall take such action, through the adoption of appropriate rules, regulations, administrative methods and standards, as may be necessary to secure to this state and its citizens all advantages available under the provisions of the Social Security Act that relate to unemployment compensation, the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, the Wagner-Peyser Act and the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, all as amended.

In the administration of the provisions of this section, which are enacted to conform with the requirements of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, as amended, the department shall take such actions as may be necessary:

To ensure that the provisions are so interpreted and applied as to meet the requirements of such federal act as interpreted by the United States Department of Labor; and

To secure to this state the full reimbursement of the federal share of extended benefits paid under this chapter that are reimbursable under the federal act; and also

To limit the amount of extended benefits paid as may be necessary so that the reimbursement of the federal share of extended benefits paid shall remain at one-half (1/2) of the total extended benefits paid.

B. As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Extended benefit period” means a period which:

Begins with the third week after a week for which there is a state “on” indicator; and

Ends with either of the following weeks, whichever occurs later:

The third week after the first week for which there is a state “off” indicator; or

The thirteenth consecutive week of such period.

No extended benefit period may begin by reason of a state “on” indicator before the fourteenth week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state.

For weeks beginning after September 25, 1982, there is a “state ‘on’ indicator” for a week if the rate of insured unemployment under this chapter for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks:

Equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the average of such rates for the corresponding period of thirteen (13) weeks ending in each of the preceding two (2) calendar years; and

Equaled or exceeded five percent (5%).

The determination of whether there has been a state “on” or “off” indicator beginning or ending any extended benefit period shall be made under this subsection as if (i) paragraph (2) did not contain subparagraph (a) thereof, and (ii) the figure “5” contained in subparagraph (b) thereof were “6”; except that, notwithstanding any such provision of this subsection, any week for which there would otherwise be a “state ‘on’ indicator” shall continue to be such week and shall not be determined to be a week for which there is a “state ‘off’ indicator.”

There is a “state ‘off’ indicator” for a week if, for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks, either subparagraph (a) or (b) of paragraph (2) was not satisfied.

“Rate of insured unemployment,” for purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, means the percentage derived by dividing:

The average number of continued weeks claimed for regular state compensation in this state for weeks of unemployment with respect to the most recent period of thirteen (13) consecutive weeks, as determined by the department on the basis of its reports to the United States Secretary of Labor; by

The average monthly employment covered under this chapter for the first four (4) of the most recent six (6) completed calendar quarters ending before the end of such period of thirteen (13) weeks.

“Regular benefits” means benefits payable to an individual under this chapter or under any other state law (including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 USCS Section 8501-8525) other than extended benefits.

“Extended benefits” means benefits (including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 USCS Section 8501-8525) payable to an individual under the provisions of this section for weeks of unemployment in his eligibility period.

“Eligibility period” of an individual means the period consisting of the weeks in his benefit year which begin in an extended benefit period and, if his benefit year ends within such extended benefit period, any weeks thereafter which begin in such period.

“Exhaustee” means an individual who, with respect to any week of unemployment in his eligibility period:

Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits that were available to him under this chapter or any other state law (including dependents’ allowances and benefits payable to federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen under 5 USCS Section 8501-8525) in his current benefit year that includes such week.

For the purposes of this subparagraph, an individual shall be deemed to have received all of the regular benefits that were available to him although, as a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages that were not considered in the original monetary determination in his benefit year, he may subsequently be determined to be entitled to added regular benefits; or

Has no, or insufficient, wages on the basis of which he could establish a new benefit year that would include such week, his benefit year having expired prior to such week; and

Has no right to unemployment benefits or allowances, as the case may be, under the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act, the Trade Expansion Act of 1962, the Automotive Products Trade Act of 1965, and such other federal laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United States Secretary of Labor; and

Has not received and is not seeking unemployment benefits under the Unemployment Compensation Law of the Virgin Islands or of Canada; but if he is seeking such benefits and the appropriate agency finally determines that he is not entitled to benefits under such law, he is considered an exhaustee; however, the reference in this subsection to the Virgin Islands shall be inapplicable effective on the day on which the United States Secretary of Labor approves under Section 3304(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, an unemployment compensation law submitted to the Secretary by the Virgin Islands for approval.

“State law” means the unemployment insurance law of any state, approved by the United States Secretary of Labor under Section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 USCS Section 3304).

C. Except when the result would be inconsistent with the other provisions of this section, as provided in the regulations of the department, the provisions of this chapter which apply to claims for, or the payment of, regular benefits shall apply to claims for, and the payment of, extended benefits.

D. An individual shall be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in his eligibility period only if the department finds that with respect to such week:

E. The weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual for a week of total unemployment in his eligibility period shall be an amount equal to the weekly benefit amount payable to him during his applicable benefit year; however, benefits paid to individuals during eligibility periods beginning before October 1, 1983, shall be computed to the next higher multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), if not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00); and benefits paid to individuals during eligibility periods beginning on or after October 1, 1983, shall be computed to the next lower multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), if not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00). In no event shall the weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual be more than two (2) times the amount of the reimbursement of the federal share of extended benefits paid.

F. (1) The total extended benefit amount payable to any eligible individual with respect to his applicable benefit year shall be the least of the following amounts:

Fifty percent (50%) of the total amount of regular benefits which were payable to him under this chapter in his applicable benefit year; however, benefits paid to individuals during eligibility periods beginning before October 1, 1983, shall be computed to the next higher multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), if not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), and benefits paid to individuals during eligibility periods beginning on or after October 1, 1983, shall be computed to the next lower multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), if not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00); or

Thirteen (13) times his weekly benefit amount which was payable to him under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year.

The total extended benefits otherwise payable to an individual who is filing an interstate claim under the interstate benefit payment plan shall not exceed two (2) weeks whenever an extended benefit period is not in effect for such week in the state where the claim is filed.

In no event shall the total extended benefit amount payable to any eligible individual with respect to his applicable benefit year be more than two (2) times the amount of the reimbursement of the federal share of extended benefits paid.

G. (1) Whenever an extended benefit period is to become effective in this state as a result of a state “on” indicator, or an extended benefit period is to be terminated in this state as a result of state “off” indicators, the department shall make an appropriate public announcement.

Computations required by the provisions of subsection B(4) shall be made by the department, in accordance with regulations prescribed by the United States Secretary of Labor.

H. Extended benefits paid under the provisions of this section which are not reimbursable from federal funds shall be charged to the experience-rating record of base period employers.

I. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections C and D of this section, an individual shall be disqualified for receipt of extended benefits if the department finds that during any week of his eligibility period:

The entitlement to benefits of any individual who is determined not to be actively engaged in seeking work in any week for the foregoing reasons shall be decided pursuant to the able and available requirements in Section 71-5-511 without regard to the disqualification provisions otherwise applicable under Section 71-5-541. The conditions prescribed in clauses (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph (b) must be applied in the same manner to individuals filing claims for regular benefits.

He has failed either to apply for or to accept an offer of suitable work (as defined under paragraph (3)) to which he was referred by the department; or

He has failed to furnish tangible evidence that he has actively engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to find work, unless such individual is not actively engaged in seeking work because such individual is:

Before any court of the United States or any state pursuant to a lawfully issued summons to appear for jury duty;

Hospitalized for treatment of an emergency or a life-threatening condition.

The gross average weekly remuneration payable for the work exceeds the sum of the individual’s weekly extended benefit amount plus the amount, if any, of supplemental unemployment benefits (as defined in Section 501(c)(17)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954) payable to such individual for such week;

The wages payable for the work equal the higher of the minimum wages provided by Section 6(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (without regard to any exemption), or the state or local minimum wage; and

The position was offered to the individual in writing or was listed with the state employment service; and

Such work otherwise meets the definition of “suitable work” for regular benefits contained in Section 71-5-513A(4) to the extent that such criteria of suitability are not inconsistent with the provisions of this paragraph (3); and

The individual cannot furnish satisfactory evidence to the department that his prospects for obtaining work in his customary occupation within a reasonably short period are good. If such evidence is deemed satisfactory for this purpose, the determination of whether any work is suitable with respect to such individual shall be made in accordance with the definition of suitable work contained in Section 71-5-513A(4) without regard to the definition specified by this paragraph (3).

Notwithstanding any provisions of subsection I to the contrary, no work shall be deemed to be suitable work for an individual which does not accord with the labor standard provisions set forth herein under Section 71-5-513A(4).

The employment service shall refer any claimant entitled to extended benefits under this section to any suitable work which meets the criteria prescribed in paragraph (3).

An individual shall be disqualified for extended benefits for the week, or fraction thereof, which immediately follows the day on which he left work voluntarily without good cause (as defined in Section 71-5-513A(1)), was discharged for misconduct connected with his work, or refused suitable work (except as provided in subsection I of this section), and for each week thereafter until he has earned remuneration for personal services performed for an employer, as in this chapter defined, equal to not less than eight (8) times his weekly benefit amount, as determined in each case.

The provisions of paragraphs I(1) through (6) of this section shall not apply to claims for weeks of unemployment beginning after March 6, 1993, and before January 1, 1995, and during that period the provisions of this chapter applicable to claims for regular compensation shall apply.

J. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if the benefit year of any individual ends within an extended benefit period, the remaining balance of extended benefits that such individual would, but for this section, be entitled to receive in that extended benefit period, with respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after the end of the benefit year, shall be reduced (but not below zero) by the product of the number of weeks for which the individual received any amounts as trade readjustment allowances within that benefit year, multiplied by the individual’s weekly benefit amount for extended benefits.

He is an “exhaustee” as defined in subsection B(8) of this section.

He has satisfied the requirements of this chapter for the receipt of regular benefits that are applicable to individuals claiming extended benefits, including not being subject to a disqualification for the receipt of benefits.

For a week beginning after September 25, 1982, he has, during his base period, been paid wages for insured work equal to not less than forty (40) times his weekly benefit amount; he has been paid wages for insured work during at least two (2) quarters of his base period, and he has, during that quarter of his base period in which his total wages were highest, been paid wages for insured work equal to not less than twenty-six (26) times the minimum weekly benefit amount.

Such disqualification shall begin with the week in which such failure occurred and shall continue until he has been employed in each of eight (8) subsequent weeks (whether or not consecutive) and has earned remuneration for personal services performed for an employer, as in this chapter defined, equal to not less than eight (8) times his weekly extended benefit amount.

For the purpose of subparagraph (a) of paragraph (1) the term “suitable work” means any work which is within the individual’s capabilities to perform, if:

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7389.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 15; Laws, 1977, ch. 497, § 9; Laws, 1981, ch. 466, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 480, § 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 364, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 498, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 316, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 335; Laws, 1993, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 47; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 46, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-543.
Authorization to waive recovery of benefits paid to ineligible persons under certain circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the executive director of the department may waive recovery of benefits paid under this chapter to a person if the person is subsequently found to be ineligible for the benefit and the benefits were paid as a direct result of unemployment caused by a natural disaster which is declared by the President of the United States in accordance with Section 401 of the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act. All waivers shall be granted based upon a consistent methodology and shall include consideration of ability to repay and other similar considerations.

The waiver authorized in subsection (1) of this section shall not be granted if:

The individual receiving the benefit is found to be guilty of fraud involving filing for, or receipt of, the benefits; or

The size of fund index (as defined in Section 71-5-355) for the year in which a request for a waiver is made is less than five-tenths (.5).

All waiver requests shall be considered on a case by case basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.